Washington statutes.
RCW 25.10.496

Limitations on distribution.

(1) A limited partnership may not make a distribution in violation of the partnership agreement.

(2) A limited partnership may not make a distribution to the extent that at the time of the distribution, after giving effect to the distribution:

(a) The limited partnership would not be able to pay its debts as they become due in the ordinary course of the limited partnership's activities; or

(b) The limited partnership's total assets would be less than the sum of its total liabilities other than liabilities to partners on account of their partnership interests and liabilities for which recourse of creditors is limited to specified property of the limited partnership, except that the fair value of property that is subject to a liability for which the recourse of creditors is limited shall be included in the assets of the limited partnership only to the extent that the fair value of that property exceeds that liability.

(3) A limited partnership may base a determination that a distribution is not prohibited under subsection (2) of this section on financial statements prepared on the basis of accounting practices and principles that are reasonable in the circumstances or on a fair valuation or other method that is reasonable in the circumstances.

(4) Except as otherwise provided in subsection (7) of this section, the effect of a distribution under subsection (2) of this section is measured:

(a) In the case of distribution by purchase, redemption, or other acquisition of a transferable interest in the limited partnership, as of the date money or other property is transferred or debt incurred by the limited partnership; and

(b) In all other cases, as of the date:

(i) The distribution is authorized, if the payment occurs within one hundred twenty days after that date; or

(ii) The payment is made, if payment occurs more than one hundred twenty days after the distribution is authorized.

(5) A limited partnership's indebtedness to a partner incurred by reason of a distribution made in accordance with this section is at parity with the limited partnership's indebtedness to its general, unsecured creditors.

(6) A limited partnership's indebtedness, including indebtedness issued in connection with or as part of a distribution, is not considered a liability for purposes of subsection (2) of this section if the terms of the indebtedness provide that payment of principal and interest are made only to the extent that a distribution could then be made to partners under this section.

(7) The effect of a distribution of indebtedness under subsection (2) of this section is measured:

(a) In the case of a distribution of indebtedness described in subsection (6) of this section, each payment of principal or interest is treated as a distribution, the effect of which is measured on the date the payment is actually made; and

(b) In the case of a distribution of any other indebtedness, the effect of the distribution is measured as of the date the indebtedness is distributed.

[ 2022 c 42 s 204; 2009 c 188 s 508.]